Missouri, session 2026, HB3489.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 160.572, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 160.572 and 173.1360, to read as follows:
160.572. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) ["ACT assessment", the ACT assessment or the ACT Plus Writing assessment;
(2)] "High school", a public school, not including a charter school, that provides
instruction to students in any combinations of grades nine, ten, eleven, or twelve;
(2) "WorkKeys", the ACT WorkKeys assessments required for the National Career
Readiness Certificate.
2. [(1) In any school year in which the department of elementary and secondary
education directs a state-funded census administration of the ACT assessment to any group of
students, any student who would be allowed or required to participate in the census
administration shall receive the opportunity, on any date within three months before the
census administration, to participate in a state-funded administration of WorkKeys.
(2) Any student who participated in a state-funded administration of WorkKeys as
described under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not participate in any state-funded
census administration of the ACT assessment.
(3) The department of elementary and secondary education shall not require school
districts or charter schools to administer the ACT assessment to any student who participated
in a state-funded administration of WorkKeys as described under subdivision (1) of this
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3489 2
subsection] Each high school shall administer college and career readiness assessments,
including a career readiness assessment that leads to a nationally recognized work
readiness certificate, in a manner and frequency prescribed by the state board of
education to each student before the student graduates from high school.
3. [(1) In any school year in which a school district directs the administration of the
ACT assessment to any group of its students to be funded by the district, any student who
would be allowed or required to participate in the district-funded administration shall receive
the opportunity, on any date within three months before the administration, to participate in an
administration of WorkKeys funded by the school district.
(2) Nothing in this section shall require a school district to fund the administration of
the ACT assessment to any student who participated in a district-funded administration of
WorkKeys as described under subdivision (1) of this subsection] A career readiness
assessment under subsection 2 of this section may include WorkKeys.
4. A public school district may offer additional college and career readiness
assessments for students enrolled in high school, at no cost to the student, by using funds
appropriated by the general assembly for such purpose.
5. The state board of education shall promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
173.1360. Each public institution of higher education may adopt and implement
a policy to use a Platinum, Gold, or Silver credential earned through the ACT
WorkKeys National Career Readiness Certificate (NCRC) as transcribable credit
toward the attainment of a postsecondary technical degree as recommended by the
American Council on Education (ACE) national guide.
✔